Idaho statutes. Title 66 STATE CHARITABLE INSTITUTIONS
Chapter 3 HOSPITALIZATION OF MENTALLY ILL
§ 66-330. Transportation — Temporary detention — Notice.

After the dispositioner has designated the place of treatment, he shall notify the facility director of the disposition and of any medical, security or behavioral needs of the committed patient. The county shall deliver the patient within forty-eight (48) hours to the designated facility. Whenever practicable, the individual may be accompanied by one or more of his friends or relatives.

Pending his removal to the designated place of treatment, a patient taken into custody or ordered to be committed to the custody of the department director pursuant to this chapter may be detained in his home, a licensed foster home, or any other suitable facility under such reasonable conditions as the dispositioner may fix, but he shall not be detained in a nonmedical facility used for the detention of individuals charged with or convicted of penal offenses. The dispositioner shall take such reasonable measures, to secure proper mental health care and treatment of an individual temporarily detained pursuant to this chapter.

The dispositioner shall notify the court, the patient’s attorney and either the patient’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend, of the facility to which the patient has been dispositioned.

§ 66-331. Care and treatment in a federal facility.

If an involuntary patient committed pursuant to the provisions of section 66-329, Idaho Code, is eligible for care or treatment by any agency of the United States, the department director or his designee, upon receipt of a certificate from such agency showing that facilities are available and that the involuntary patient is eligible for care and treatment therein, may authorize the involuntary patient to be placed in the custody of such agency for care and treatment.

Upon effecting any such transfer, the department director or his designee shall notify the committing court, the involuntary patient’s attorney and either the involuntary patient’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend, as stated on the order of commitment, of such transfer. Records pertaining to the involuntary patient shall be sent by the sending facility to the receiving facility as soon as possible.

When admitted to any facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, by any such agency within or without the state, the involuntary patient shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the agency. The chief officer of any facility operated by such agency shall, with respect to involuntary patients admitted to that facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, be vested with the same powers as the department director with respect to detention, custody, transfer, conditional release or discharge. Jurisdiction shall be retained in appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of an involuntary patient admitted to a facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and to determine the necessity for continuance of the person’s commitment, and every order of commitment issued pursuant to section 66-329, Idaho Code, shall be so conditioned.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia, committing a person to any agency of the United States, and any transfer of any committed person to any agency of the United States for care and treatment, shall have the same force and effect as to the committed person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the judgment or making the order, or the entity effecting the transfer; and the courts of the committing state, or of the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of such person, and of determining the necessity for continuance of the person’s commitment, as is provided for persons committed by the courts of this state in subsection (c) of this section. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the committing state or the District of Columbia in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of an agency of the United States with respect to detention, custody, transfer, conditional release or discharge under this section.

§ 66-332. Notice of commitment. [Repealed.]

§ 66-333. Examination of newly admitted patients.

Every patient committed to the custody of the department director pursuant to the provisions of section 66-329, Idaho Code, and admitted to an inpatient facility shall receive a physical and mental health examination as soon as practicable after admission.

§ 66-334. Transfer of patients between certain inpatient treatment facilities.

The department director or his designee may transfer, or authorize the transfer of, an involuntary patient from one inpatient treatment facility to another, if he determines that it would be consistent with the mental health needs of the patient to do so. Whenever a patient is transferred, written notice thereof shall be given to the patient’s attorney, either the patient’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend and the committing court.

Upon receipt of a certificate of an agency of any other state or private facility in any state, that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any patient committed or otherwise being cared for and treated pursuant to this chapter and that the patient is eligible for care or treatment in a facility of such agency, or if the patient or his next of kin or his guardian wish to have him cared for in some other facility, the department director or his designee may transfer him to such facility for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the patient’s attorney, either the patient’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend and the committing court shall be immediately notified of such transfer. Any patient transferred as herein provided shall be deemed to be in the custody of such facility to the same extent and subject to the same limitations as if he had been ordered to be placed in its custody under section 66-329, Idaho Code.

Records pertaining to the patient and retained by the sending facility shall be forwarded to the receiving facility within a reasonable time prior to or after the patient’s transfer.

Jurisdiction is retained in appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of any patient so transferred and to determine the necessity for continuance of the commitment.

§ 66-335. Commitment of mentally ill convicts.

Mentally ill convicts may be received into said facilities in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board of health and welfare acting in conjunction with the state board of correction.

§ 66-336. Any person mentally ill may be hospitalized. [Repealed.]

§ 66-337. Review, termination of commitment and discharge of patients.

The department director or his designee shall as frequently as practicable but at least once at the end of the first ninety (90) days examine or cause to be examined every patient committed to his custody or admitted to an inpatient facility of the state of Idaho, and determine whether to conditionally release, discharge or terminate the commitment of the patient. If the patient has not been conditionally released, discharged, or had the commitment terminated a similar review shall be conducted every one hundred twenty (120) days thereafter. A report of each review and determination regarding an involuntary patient shall be sent to the committing court, prosecuting attorney of the county of commitment, if any, the patient’s attorney, and either the patient’s spouse, guardian, next of kin or friend.

The commitment of an involuntary patient shall be terminated if the patient is no longer mentally ill or is no longer likely to injure himself or others or is no longer gravely disabled; provided, that patients admitted under section 18-214, Idaho Code, acquitted of criminal charges filed prior to July 1, 1982, on grounds of mental disease or defect, or committed pursuant to sections 18-212(4) and 66-329, Idaho Code, as unfit to proceed, may not be released from an inpatient facility unless thirty (30) days before such release, the department director or his designee shall notify the committing court and prosecuting attorney of the contemplated release.

Upon notification of intention to release from an inpatient facility either a patient admitted under section 18-214, Idaho Code, acquitted of criminal charges filed prior to July 1, 1982, on grounds of mental disease or defect, or committed pursuant to sections 18-212(4) and 66-329, Idaho Code, as unfit to proceed, and upon motion of an interested party or the court on its own motion, the court shall determine whether the conditions justifying such release exist. In making such determination, the court may order an independent examination of the patient. The cost of such independent examination must be borne by the party making the motion or, if indigent, the county having jurisdiction of the case. If no motion is made, the patient may be released according to the notice.

Section 18-214, Idaho Code, shall remain in full force and effect for every individual previously acquitted pursuant to section 18-213, Idaho Code. Section 18-214, Idaho Code, as last amended by section 2, chapter 13, laws of 1977, which is placed here for reference only and is not a reenactment of section 18-214, Idaho Code, and reads as follows:

(2) If the director of the department of health and welfare is of the view that a person committed to his custody, pursuant to paragraph (1) of this section, may be discharged or released on condition without danger to himself or to others, he shall make application for the discharge or release of such person in a report to the court by which such person was committed and shall transmit a copy of such application and report to the prosecuting attorney of the county from which the defendant was committed. The court shall thereupon appoint at least two (2) qualified psychiatrists to examine such person and to report within sixty (60) days, or such longer period as the court determines to be necessary for the purpose, their opinion as to his mental condition. To facilitate such examination and the proceedings thereon, the court may cause such person to be confined in any institution located near the place where the court sits, which may hereafter be designated by the director of the department of health and welfare as suitable for the temporary detention of irresponsible persons.
(3) If the court is satisfied by the report filed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this section and such testimony of the reporting psychiatrists as the court deems necessary that the committed person may be discharged or released on condition without danger to himself or others, the court shall order his discharge or his release on such conditions as the court determines to be necessary. If the court is not so satisfied, it shall promptly order a hearing to determine whether such person may safely be discharged or released. Any such hearing shall be deemed a civil proceeding and the burden shall be upon the committed person to prove that he may safely be discharged or released. According to the determination of the court upon the hearing, the committed person shall thereupon be discharged or released on such conditions as the court determines to be necessary, or shall be recommitted to the custody of the director of the department of health and welfare, subject to discharge or release only in accordance with the procedure prescribed above for a first hearing.

(4) If, within five (5) years after the conditional release of a committed person, the court shall determine, after hearing evidence, that the conditions of release have not been fulfilled and that for the safety of such person or for the safety of others his conditional release should be revoked, the court shall forthwith order him to be recommitted to the custody of the director of the department of health and welfare subject to discharge or release only in accordance with the procedure prescribed above for a first hearing.

(5) A committed person may make application for his discharge or release to the court by which he was committed, and the procedure to be followed upon such application shall be the same as that prescribed above in the case of an application by the director of the department of health and welfare. However, no such application by a committed person need be considered until he has been confined for a period of not less than six (6) months from the date of the order of commitment and if the determination of the court be adverse to the application, such person shall not be permitted to file a further application until one (1) year has elapsed from the date of any preceding hearing on an application for his release or discharge.

(6) If a defendant escapes from custody during his confinement, the director shall immediately notify the court from which committed, the prosecuting attorney and the sheriff of the county from which committed. The court shall forthwith issue an order authorizing any health officer, peace officer, or the director of the institution from which the defendant escaped, to take the defendant into custody and immediately return him to his place of confinement.

§ 66-338. Conditional release. [Repealed.]

§ 66-339. Rehospitalization of patients conditionally released from inpatient treatment facilities

Procedure. [Repealed.]

§ 66-339A. Outpatient commitment. [Repealed.]

§ 66-339B. Outpatient commitment hearing. [Repealed.]

§ 66-339C. Noncompliance with court order. [Repealed.]

§ 66-340. Appeal from order of rehospitalization. [Repealed.]

§ 66-341. Exemptions from liability.

No agency, public or private facility, nor an employee of a public or private facility, nor the superintendent, professional person in charge, or attending staff of any such facility, nor any public official performing functions necessary to the administration of this chapter, nor a peace officer responsible for detaining or transporting a person pursuant to this chapter, shall be civilly or criminally liable for detaining, failing to detain, diagnosing, transporting, treating or releasing a person pursuant to this chapter; provided that such duties were performed according to the procedures of this chapter in good faith and without gross negligence.

§ 66-342. Change in disposition

Appeal. [Repealed.]

§ 66-343. Petition for reexamination of order of commitment.

All patients committed pursuant to section 66-329, Idaho Code, shall be entitled to a reexamination of the order for or conditions of his commitment on his own petition, or that of his legal guardian, parent, spouse, relative, attorney or friend, to the district court of the county in which the patient was committed or is found. Within three (3) years of the effective date of this act, the department shall petition for the reexamination of all patients committed pursuant to section 66-329, Idaho Code, prior to the effective date of this act. Upon receipt of the petition the court shall determine whether the conditions justifying involuntary care and treatment continue to exist except that such proceedings shall not be required to be conducted if the petition is filed sooner than four (4) months after the issuance of the order of commitment or sooner than one (1) year after the filing of a previous petition under this section.

§ 66-344. Right to humane care and treatment.

Every patient shall be entitled to humane care and treatment.

§ 66-345. Restraints and seclusion.

Restraints shall not be applied to a patient nor shall a patient be secluded unless it is determined that such restraint or seclusion is necessary for the patient’s safety or for the safety of others. Every instance of a restraint or seclusion of a patient shall be documented in the clinical record of the patient. In addition, every instance of a restraint or seclusion shall be evaluated and the evaluation and reasons for such restraint or seclusion shall be made a part of the clinical record of the patient under the signature of a licensed physician or, as delegated through the bylaws of the hospital’s medical or professional staff, other practitioners licensed to practice independently. Whenever a peace officer deems it necessary to apply restraints to a patient while transporting the patient from one (1) facility to another and that restraint is against the medical advice of a licensed physician, the officer shall document the use of restraints in a report to be included in the clinical record.

§ 66-346. Right to communication and visitation — Exercise of civil rights.

Every patient shall have the following rights:

To communicate by sealed mail or otherwise, with persons, inside or outside the facility and to have access to reasonable amounts of letter writing material and postage;

To receive visitors at all reasonable times;

To wear his own clothes; to keep and use his own personal possessions including toilet articles; to keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his own money for canteen expenses and small purchases; to have access to individual storage space for his private use;

To refuse specific modes of treatment;

To be visited by his attorney or any employee of his attorney’s firm, or a representative of the state protection and advocacy system at any time;

To exercise all civil rights, including the right to dispose of property except property described in subsection (3) above, execute instruments, make purchases, enter into contractual relationships, and vote unless limited by prior court order;

To have reasonable access to all records concerning himself.

Notwithstanding any limitations authorized under this section on the right of communication, every patient shall be entitled to communicate by sealed mail with the court, if any, which ordered his commitment.

The director of a facility may deny a patient’s rights under this section, except that the rights enumerated in subsections (a)(5) and (a)(6) of this section, shall not be denied by the director of the facility under any circumstances. Only in cases of emergency or when a court has determined that a patient lacks capacity to make informed decisions about treatment, may the director of a facility deny a patient’s rights under subsection (a)(4) of this section. A statement explaining the reasons for any denial of a patient’s rights shall be immediately entered in his treatment record and if the patient has been committed pursuant to court order, copies of such statement shall be submitted to the committing court and sent to the patient’s spouse, guardian, adult next of kin or friend and attorney, if any.

A list of the foregoing rights shall be prominently posted in all facilities and brought to the attention of the patient by such means as the board of health and welfare shall designate.

§ 66-347. Writ of habeas corpus.

Any individual detained pursuant to this act shall be entitled to the writ of habeas corpus upon proper petition by himself or a friend to any court generally empowered to issue the writ of habeas corpus in the county in which he is detained.

§ 66-348. Disclosure of information.

All certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the purpose of this act and directly or indirectly identifying a patient or former patient or an individual whose involuntary assessment, detention or commitment is being sought under this act shall be kept subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code; provided that such records may also be disclosed to any person:

If the individual identified, his attorney in fact for mental health care, or his legal guardian, if any, shall consent; or

If disclosure may be necessary to carry out any of the provisions of this act; or

If a court directs upon its determination that disclosure is necessary and that failure to make disclosure would be contrary to the public interest.

§ 66-349. Penalty for violation.

Any person violating any provisions of sections 66-344, 66-345, 66-346, 66-347, or 66-348[, Idaho Code,] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than $500 and imprisonment for not more than one (1) year.

§ 66-350. Detention pending judicial determination.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, no patient with respect to whom proceedings for judicial commitment have been commenced shall be released or discharged during the pendency of such proceedings unless ordered by the court or a judge thereof upon the application of the patient, or his legal guardian, parent, spouse, or next of kin, or upon the report of the director of the facility that the patient may be discharged with safety.

§ 66-351. Repayment of money on discharge of patient.

If, at the time of the discharge of a person from any facility, or after the death and burial of any person therein confined, there remain in the custody of the director of the facility any unexpended moneys paid for the support or maintenance of such person, they must, upon demand, be repaid to the person or his personal representative.

§ 66-352. Money found on mentally ill persons — Disposition.

Any moneys, or other things of value, found on the person of a mentally ill person at the time of proceedings for involuntary commitment must be certified to by the judge and sent with such person to the facility, there to be delivered to the director of the facility who shall hold said money in trust as provided in chapter 5 of title 66, Idaho Code. All money received by or for a patient, voluntarily or involuntarily committed, while at the facility shall be placed in trust as provided in said chapter 5[, title 66, Idaho Code].

§ 66-353. Fees of designated examiner. [Repealed.]

§ 66-354. Mentally ill person with assets sufficient to pay expenses — Liability of relatives.

When a mentally ill person has been admitted to a state facility voluntarily or involuntarily, the director of the facility may cause an inquiry to be made as to the financial circumstances of such person and of the relatives of such person legally liable for his or her support, and if it is found that such person or said relatives, legally liable for the support of the patient, are able to pay the expenses for commitment proceedings and the charges for the care and treatment of the patient in the facility, in whole or in part, it shall be the duty of the director of the facility to collect such expenses and such charges, and if necessary to institute in the name of the state, a civil suit against the person or persons liable therefor.

The following relatives shall be bound by law to provide for the expenses and charges for the commitment, care and treatment of such mentally ill person referred to in this act: husband for the wife, and the wife for the husband; the parent for his or her minor child or minor children, and the children for their parents.

§ 66-355. Appointment of guardian — Incompetency of mentally ill person requires separate proceedings — Liability for care and treatment costs.

The incompetency of a mentally ill person shall be determined in the same manner that incompetency is determined in any other person and shall be a separate judicial proceeding. Any guardian appointed in the case of a mentally ill incompetent person, is subject to all the provisions of the general laws of the state of Idaho in relation to guardians and wards. Whenever a mentally ill person is receiving care and treatment in a facility in the event that incompetency is adjudicated and a guardian appointed, the court on determining the incompetency must inquire into the ability of the mentally ill person to pay for his or her expenses which arise in connection with his or her care and treatment, if any, transportation to the facility, court costs for incompetency proceedings, and for the care and treatment for such person for such time as he remains in such facility, and when there are sufficient assets in the hands of the guardian, the court may order a sale of property or such part thereof as may be necessary, and from the proceeds of such sale the guardian must pay for all expenses and reasonable charges for the patient’s care and treatment, or such part as it is possible to pay, to the director of the facility in which said mentally ill person is a patient.

§ 66-356. Relief from firearms disabilities.

A court that:

Orders commitment pursuant to section 66-329, Idaho Code;

Orders commitment or treatment pursuant to section 66-406, Idaho Code;

Appoints a guardian pursuant to section 66-322, Idaho Code, or section 15-5-304, Idaho Code;

Appoints a conservator pursuant to section 15-5-407(b), Idaho Code;

Appoints a guardian or conservator pursuant to section 66-404, Idaho Code; or

Finds a defendant incompetent to stand trial pursuant to section 18-212, Idaho Code, shall make a finding as to whether the subject of the proceeding is a person to whom the provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and (g)(4) apply. If the court so finds, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order to the Idaho state police, which in turn shall forward a copy to the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency, for inclusion in the national instant criminal background check system database.

A person who is subject to an order, including an appointment or finding described in subsection (1) of this section, may petition the magistrate division of the court that issued such order, or the magistrate division of the district court of the county where the individual resides, to remove the person’s firearms-related disabilities as provided in section 105(a) of P.L. 110-180. A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the director of the department of health and welfare and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the original order, appointment or finding occurred, and such department and office may, as it deems appropriate, appear, support, object to and present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner. The court shall receive and consider evidence, including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:

The circumstances of the original order, appointment or finding;

The petitioner’s mental health and criminal history records, if any;

The petitioner’s reputation; and

Changes in the petitioner’s condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

When a court issues an order granting a petition for relief under subsection (2) of this section, the clerk of the court shall immediately forward a copy of the order to the Idaho state police, which in turn shall immediately forward a copy to the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency, for inclusion in the national instant criminal background check system database.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner will not be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety and that the granting of the relief would not be contrary to the public interest. The petitioner may appeal a denial of the requested relief, and review on appeal shall be de novo. A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

§ 66-357. Residence requirement met by guardian. [Repealed.]

§ 66-358. Reciprocal agreements controlled by residence definition. [Repealed.]

§ 66-359. Patient status contributing to residence requirement. [Repealed.]

§ 66-360. Commitment to veterans administration

Procedure. [Repealed.]

§ 66-361 — 66-364. Dangerously mentally ill persons and prisoners. [Repealed.]